Hawaii statutes.
[§111-5] Not treated as income. No
payment received under this chapter shall be considered as income for purposes
of the state income tax law; nor shall such payments be considered as income to
any recipient of public assistance and such payment shall not be deducted from
the amount of aid to which the recipient would otherwise be entitled under
state welfare program. [L 1970, c 166, §5]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next